Tennessee, session 114, SB1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-104-205, is amended by deleting
the language "within sixty (60) days" and substituting "within seventy-five (75) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1333
003386
- 1 -